Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.080

Defense of usury or maintaining action thereon prohibited if transaction primarily agricultural, commercial, investment, or business—Exception.

Profit and nonprofit corporations, Massachusetts trusts, associations, trusts, general partnerships, joint ventures, limited partnerships, and governments and governmental subdivisions, agencies, or instrumentalities may not plead the defense of usury nor maintain any action thereon or therefor, and persons may not plead the defense of usury nor maintain any action thereon or therefor if the transaction was primarily for agricultural, commercial, investment, or business purposes: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this section shall not apply to a consumer transaction of any amount.

Consumer transactions, as used in this section, shall mean transactions primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

[ 1981 c 78 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 180 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 97 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 142 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 78: See note following RCW 19.52.020.